Washington statutes.
RCW 39.89.070

Apportionment of taxes.

(1) Commencing in the calendar year following the passage of the ordinance, the county treasurer shall distribute receipts from regular taxes imposed on real property located in the increment area as follows:

(a) Each taxing district shall receive that portion of its regular property taxes produced by the rate of tax levied by or for the taxing district on the tax allocation base value for that community revitalization financing project in the taxing district, or upon the total assessed value of real property in the taxing district, whichever is smaller; and

(b) The local government that created the increment area shall receive an additional portion of the regular property taxes levied by or for each taxing district upon the increment value within the increment area. However, the local government that created the increment area may agree to receive less than the full amount of this portion as long as bond debt service, reserve, and other bond covenant requirements are satisfied, in which case the balance of these tax receipts shall be allocated to the taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or have regular property taxes imposed for them, in the increment area for collection that year in proportion to their regular tax levy rates for collection that year. The local government may request that the treasurer transfer this additional portion of the property taxes to its designated agent. The portion of the tax receipts distributed to the local government or its agent under this subsection (1)(b) may only be expended to finance public improvement costs associated with the public improvements financed in whole or in part by community revitalization financing.

(2) The county assessor shall allocate twenty-five percent of any increased real property value occurring in the increment area to the tax allocation base value and seventy-five percent to the increment value. This section does not authorize revaluations of real property by the assessor for property taxation that are not made in accordance with the assessor's revaluation plan under chapter 84.41 RCW or under other authorized revaluation procedures.

(3) The apportionment of increases in assessed valuation in an increment area, and the associated distribution to the local government of receipts from regular property taxes that are imposed on the increment value, must cease when tax allocation revenues are no longer necessary or obligated to pay the costs of the public improvements. Any excess tax allocation revenues and earnings on the tax allocation revenues remaining at the time the apportionment of tax receipts terminates must be returned to the county treasurer and distributed to the taxing districts that imposed regular property taxes, or had regular property taxes imposed for it, in the increment area for collection that year, in proportion to the rates of their regular property tax levies for collection that year.

[ 2001 c 212 s 7.]